Utah statutes.
41-4-14.   Separability clause.
If any section, subsection, sentence, clause or phrase of this act is for any
reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the
validity of the remaining portions of this act. The Legislature hereby
declares that it would have passed this act, and each section, subsection,
sentence, clause and phrase thereof irrespective of the fact that any one or
more other sections, subsections, sentences, clauses or phrases be declared
unconstitutional.
